Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Spurious Liens and Documents

38-35-201.
Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Federal official or employee” means an appointed or elected official or any employee of the government of the United States of America or of any agency of such government as defined for purposes of the “Federal Tort Claims Act”, 28 U.S.C. sec. 2671.

“Lien” means an encumbrance on real or personal property as security for the payment of a debt or performance of an obligation.

“Spurious document” means any document that is forged or groundless, contains a material misstatement or false claim, or is otherwise patently invalid.

“Spurious lien” means a purported lien or claim of lien that:

Is not provided for by a specific Colorado or federal statute or by a specific ordinance or charter of a home rule municipality;

Is not created, suffered, assumed, or agreed to by the owner of the property it purports to encumber; or

Is not imposed by order, judgment, or decree of a state court or a federal court.

“State court” means a court established pursuant to title 13, C.R.S.

“State or local official or employee” means an appointed or elected official or any employee of:

The state of Colorado;

Any agency, board, commission, or state department in any branch of state government;

Any institution of higher education; or

Any school district, political subdivision, county, municipality, intergovernmental agency, or other unit of local government in Colorado.

History.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 35, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 98:

(4)(a) amended, p. 152, § 1, effective April 2.

38-35-202.
Recording or filing.

Any state or local official or employee, including the clerk and recorder of any county or city and county and the Colorado secretary of state, may accept or reject for recording or filing any document that the state or local official or employee reasonably believes in good faith may be a spurious lien or spurious document.

No state or local official or employee, including the clerk and recorder of any county or city and county and the Colorado secretary of state, shall be liable to any person or claimant for either the acceptance or rejection for recording or filing of any document that the state or local official or employee reasonably believes in good faith may be a spurious lien or spurious document.

No state or local official or employee, including the clerk and recorder of any county or city and county and the Colorado secretary of state, shall be obligated to accept for recording or filing any lien or claim of lien against a federal official or employee or a state or local official or employee based upon the performance or nonperformance of that official’s or employee’s duties unless such lien or claim of lien is accompanied by a specific order issued by a state court or federal court authorizing the recording or filing of such lien or claim of lien.

History.

Source: L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 36, § 1, effective March 20.

38-35-203.
Action to enforce.

No spurious lien or spurious document shall hold or affect any real or personal property longer than thirty-five days after the lien or document has been recorded or filed in the office of any state or local official or employee, including the office of the clerk and recorder of any county or city and county or the office of the Colorado secretary of state, unless within the thirty-five days:

An action has been commenced to enforce such lien or document in the state district court for the county or city and county in which the lien or document was recorded or filed or the federal district court in Colorado; and

A notice of lis pendens stating that such an action has been commenced is recorded or filed in the office where the lien or document was recorded or filed.

The notice of lis pendens required by paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section must comply with the requirements of section 38-35-110 and rule 105 (f) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure and must include the civil action number of the action that has been commenced to enforce the lien or document. Failure to comply with the requirements of this subsection (2) shall render the notice of lis pendens invalid.

History.

Source: L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 37, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2012:

IP(1) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 895, § 169, effective July 1.

38-35-204.
Order to show cause.

Any person whose real or personal property is affected by a recorded or filed lien or document that the person believes is a spurious lien or spurious document may petition the district court in the county or city and county in which the lien or document was recorded or filed or the federal district court in Colorado for an order to show cause why the lien or document should not be declared invalid. The petition shall set forth a concise statement of the facts upon which the petition is based and shall be supported by an affidavit of the petitioner or the petitioner’s attorney. The order to show cause may be granted ex parte and shall:

Direct any lien claimant and any person who recorded or filed the lien or document to appear as respondent before the court at a time and place certain not less than fourteen days nor more than twenty-one days after service of the order to show cause why the lien or document should not be declared invalid and why such other relief provided for by this section should not be granted;

State that, if the respondent fails to appear at the time and place specified, the spurious lien or spurious document will be declared invalid and released; and

State that the court shall award costs, including reasonable attorney fees, to the prevailing party.

If, following the hearing on the order to show cause, the court determines that the lien or document is a spurious lien or spurious document, the court shall make findings of fact and enter an order and decree declaring the spurious lien or spurious document and any related notice of lis pendens invalid, releasing the recorded or filed spurious lien or spurious document, and entering a monetary judgment in the amount of the petitioner’s costs, including reasonable attorney fees, against any respondent and in favor of the petitioner. A certified copy of such order may be recorded or filed in the office of any state or local official or employee, including the clerk and recorder of any county or city and county and the Colorado secretary of state.

If, following the hearing on the order to show cause, the court determines that the lien or document is not a spurious lien or spurious document, the court shall issue an order so finding and enter a monetary judgment in the amount of any respondent’s costs, including reasonable attorney fees, against any petitioner and in favor of the respondent.

History.

Source: L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 37, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) amended,(SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 895, § 170, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

Section 38-22.5-110 states that this section applies to liens asserted pursuant to article 22.5 of this title.